Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 4. Name.

§79-4-4.01.
Corporate name.

A corporate name:

Must contain the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company” or “limited,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.” or “ltd.” or words or abbreviations of like import in another language; and

May not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by Section 79-4-3.01 and its articles of incorporation.

The corporate name of a nonprofit corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

The name of a limited partnership, limited liability partnership or limited liability company that is organized or registered under the laws of this state and which has not been dissolved; and

A name that is reserved or registered in the Office of the Secretary of State for any of the entities named in subsection (b) of this section which reservation or registration has not expired.

Except as authorized by subsections (c) and (d), a corporate name must be distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from:

The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

The fictitious name adopted by a foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is unavailable;

A corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon his records from one or more of the names described in subsection (b). The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The other corporation consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Secretary of State to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Secretary of State from the name of the applying corporation; or

The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant’s right to use the name applied for in this state.

A corporation may use the name (including the fictitious name) of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state and the proposed user corporation:

Has merged with the other corporation;

Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation; or

Has acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including the corporate name, of the other corporation.

Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. does not control the use of fictitious names.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 4.01; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted (b)(2), which formerly read “A corporate name reserved and registered under Section 79-4-4.02 or 79-4-4.03;” redesignated former (b)(3) as (b)(2) and inserted “or foreign limited liability company” preceding “authorized to transact business;” redesignated former (b)(4) as (b)(3) and substituted “nonprofit” for “not-for-profit;” added (b)(4) and (b)(5); and made minor stylistic changes.

Applicability of this section to mandatory provisions of articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-2.02.

Board of directors authorized to adopt amendment to articles of incorporation to make certain changes to corporate name without share-holder approval, ss § 79-4-10.05.

Requirement that name of corporation applying for reinstatement after being administratively dissolved satisfy requirements of this section, see § 79-4-14.22.

Requirements for foreign corporation to obtain certificate of authority to transact business when its corporate name does not satisfy requirements of this section, see § 79-4-15.06.

Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-101 et seq.

This section [Code 1942, § 5322] affords to corporation protection of its corporate name as soon as corporation comes into existence and this protection continues as long as corporation continues; and relief from encroachment may be had without necessity of showing actual use of name in business. Meridian Yellow Cab Co. v. City Yellow Cabs, 206 Miss. 812, 41 So. 2d 14, 1949 Miss. LEXIS 303 (Miss. 1949).

Parties organizing corporation must choose name at its peril, and use of name similar to one adopted by another corporation, if misleading and calculated to injure it in exercise of its corporate functions, regardless of intent, may be prevented by corporation having prior right, by suit for injunction against new corporation to prevent use of name. Meridian Yellow Cab Co. v. City Yellow Cabs, 206 Miss. 812, 41 So. 2d 14, 1949 Miss. LEXIS 303 (Miss. 1949).

Construction and effect of statutes as doing business under an assumed or fictitious name or designation not showing the names of the persons interested.
42 A.L.R.2d 516.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name.
68 A.L.R.3d 1168.

Validity and application of statute prohibiting use of name descriptive of engineering by business organization not practicing profession of engineering.
13 A.L.R.4th 676.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 228 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:105 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 223 et seq.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-4.02.
Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a legal corporate name that complies with Section 79-4-4.01, including a fictitious name for a foreign corporation whose corporate name is not available, by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. However, no person or corporation may reserve the name “In God We Trust” which name shall be reserved to the people of the State of Mississippi, as a symbol thereof. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the Secretary of State finds that the corporate name applied for is available, the Secretary of State shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a one-hundred-eighty-day period. The one-hundred-eighty-day period may be renewed once by the applicant by filing a renewal application within thirty (30) days before the expiration of the initial one-hundred-eighty-day period.

The owner of a reserved corporate name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Secretary of State a signed notice of the transfer that states the name and address of the transferee.

The reservation of a specified name may be cancelled by delivering to the Secretary of State a notice of cancellation, specifying the name of the reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the owner or transferee.

Unless the Secretary of State finds that any application, notice of transfer, or notice of cancellation filed with the Secretary of State as required by this section does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required by law the Secretary of State shall prepare and return to the person who filed the instrument a copy of the filed instrument with a notation thereon of the action taken by the Secretary of State.

A fee as set forth in Section 79-4-1.22 of this chapter shall be paid at the time of the reservation of any name and at the time of the filing of a notice of the transfer or cancellation of any such reservation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 4.02; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 7; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (c) through (e).

The 2014 amendment, in (a), inserted “legal” following “the exclusive use of a” and “that complies with Section 79-4-4.01” following “corporate name” in the first sentence; added the second and last sentences; substituted “the Secretary of State” for “he” and deleted “nonrenewable” following “applicant’s exclusive use for a” in the third sentence; in (c), deleted “the Office of” following “cancelled by delivering to”; and in (e), deleted “(4)” near the beginning following “as set forth in Section 79-4-1.22.”

Fee for filing application for reserved name, see § 79-4-1.22.

Requirement that corporate name be distinguishable from corporate name reserved or registered under this section, see § 79-4-4.01.

Restrictions on corporate names, see § 79-11-157.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name.
68 A.L.R.3d 1168.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:105-74:107.

§79-4-4.03.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 468, § 9, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§79-4-4.03. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 4.03, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-4.03 provided for the registration of corporate names.

§79-4-5.01.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 123, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-5.01. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 5.01, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-5.01 required that corporations maintain a registered office and registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-5.02.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 124, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-5.02. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 5.02, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-5.02 pertained to changing a registered office or registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-5.03.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 125, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-5.03. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 5.03, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-5.03 pertained to the resignation of a registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see §§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-4-5.04.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 126, effective January 1, 2013.

§79-4-5.04. [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 5.04, eff from and after January 1, 1988.]

Former § 79-4-5.04 pertained to service of process on corporations. For present provisions, see § 79-35-13.

Effect of an amendment to articles of incorporation changing corporation’s name on proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name, see § 79-4-10.09.

Requirement that any change of name of foreign corporation authorized to transact business satisfy requirements of this section to maintain its certificate of authority, see § 79-4-15.06.

Application by foreign corporation for reinstatement of certificate of authority, see § 79-4-15.32.

Corporate name under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-157.

In granting corporate charter, state does not thereby adjudicate legal right of corporation to unlimited use of name chosen; and name, though derived through authority of state, may not be used in manner which will result in fraud or deception. Meridian Yellow Cab Co. v. City Yellow Cabs, 206 Miss. 812, 41 So. 2d 14, 1949 Miss. LEXIS 303 (Miss. 1949).

Creation of cab corporation under name “City Yellow Cabs” for operation of cabs in city in which another corporation had previously been created for operation of cabs under name of “Meridian Yellow Cab Company, Inc.” transgresses this section [Code 1942, § 5322] to extent that City Yellow Cabs may not lawfully operate under its misleading name in city and its environs in manner to confuse public, names being so similar as to be misleading. Meridian Yellow Cab Co. v. City Yellow Cabs, 206 Miss. 812, 41 So. 2d 14, 1949 Miss. LEXIS 303 (Miss. 1949).

Right to protection of corporate name, as between domestic corporation and foreign corporation not qualified to do business in state.
26 A.L.R.3d 994.

Use of “family name” by corporation as unfair competition.
72 A.L.R.3d 8.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 4.

Requirement that corporate name of foreign corporation must be distinguishable from corporate name reserved under this section, see § 79-4-15.06.

Reserving exclusive use of corporate name under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-159.

Use of “family name” by corporation as unfair competition.
72 A.L.R.3d 8.